Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 12. Piping Codes.

Sec. 18.60.850.
Piping codes.

The United States of America Standards Institute Codes listed below are established as the piping codes for the state:

B 31.1.0 — 1967 power piping;

B 31.2 — 1968 fuel gas piping;

B 31.8 — 1968 gas transmission and distribution piping system;

B 31.3 — 1966 petroleum refining piping;

B 31.4 — 1966 and B 31.4a — 1968 liquid petroleum transportation piping systems.

History.

(§ 6 ch 151 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.99.110

. Renumbered in 1984.